Utah statutes.
26-8a-306.   Medical control.
(1)  The committee shall establish requirements for the coordination of
emergency medical services rendered by emergency medical service providers,
including the coordination between prehospital providers, hospitals, emergency
patient receiving facilities, and other appropriate destinations.
(2)  The committee may establish requirements for the medical supervision of
emergency medical service providers to assure adequate physician oversight of
emergency medical services and quality improvement.
